Washington statutes.
RCW 24.60.050

Temporary emergency responders.

(1) A responding member jurisdiction may designate, in writing, persons to serve as temporary emergency responders for the purposes of deploying such persons under the intrastate building safety mutual aid system. A designation as a temporary emergency responder does not grant any right to wages, salary, pensions, health benefits, seniority or other benefits.

(2) The *intrastate building safety mutual aid oversight committee will develop guidelines and procedures detailing this temporary designation process.

[ 2011 c 215 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 2011 c 215 s 10, creating the oversight committee, was vetoed.